District of Columbia statutes.
8-1710

Participation in loan or grant.

The Soil and Water Conservation District may obtain a loan or grant of any funds, property, equipment, or services from any United States government agency or District of Columbia government agency for any of the purposes of this subchapter. In connection with any loan or grant, the Soil and Water Conservation District may pledge, encumber, or obligate any property or monies of the Soil and Water Conservation District; provided, that the encumbrance, obligation, or pledge shall not extend beyond January 1, 1987.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-143, § 11, 29 DCR 3118
1981 Ed., § 1-2810.